District of Columbia statutes.
4-109

Registration records; system of accounts.

Under the authority herein granted, the Board may prescribe forms of record keeping to secure accuracy and completeness in the registration of persons under care and the services rendered in their behalf. The Board may recommend to the Comptroller General of the United States, and the Comptroller General may prescribe, so far as practicable, a uniform system of accounts to record receipts and disbursements and to determine comparative costs of operation.

Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58, § 9

History

1981 Ed., § 3-109.
1973 Ed., § 3-109.

Prior Codifications

Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.

References in Text